Maryland, session 2026, HB1324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
10–410.
(a) (1) (i) The Department may allow a person to hunt on each Sunday of
the game bird and game mammal seasons in:
1. Allegany County;
2. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Calvert
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
– 1 –

Ch. 324 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Caroline
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
4. Cecil County;
5. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Charles
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
6. Subject to subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph, Dorchester
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
7. Garrett County;
8. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Queen
Anne’s County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
9. St. Mary’s County;
10. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, Somerset
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
11. Washington County;
12. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, Worcester
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.; and
13. Subject to subparagraph (v) of this paragraph, Wicomico
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.
(ii) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)10 and 12 of this
paragraph do not apply:
1. On each Sunday of the deer firearms season; and
2. On the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November of the deer bow hunting season.
(iii) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)2, 3, 5, and 8 of this
paragraph do not apply:
1. On each Sunday during the deer firearms season;
2. On the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November during the deer bow hunting season; and
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 324
3. On each Sunday of the spring turkey hunting season.
(iv) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)6 of this paragraph
do not apply:
1. On each Sunday of the deer hunting seasons from the first
Sunday in October through the second Sunday in January, inclusive; and
2. On each Sunday of the spring turkey hunting season.
(v) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)(13) of this
paragraph do not apply:
1. On the first Sunday of the deer firearms season; and
2. On the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November of the deer bow hunting season.
(2) The Department may allow a person to hunt deer on each Sunday of the
deer hunting seasons from the first Sunday in October through the second Sunday in
January, inclusive, in:
(i) Carroll County; and
(ii) Frederick County.
(3) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the Department
may allow a person to hunt deer on each Sunday of the deer hunting seasons from 30
minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m. in:
1. Kent County;
2. Montgomery County; and
3. Talbot County.
(ii) The time restrictions under this paragraph do not apply:
1. To a participant in a junior deer hunt authorized under
this subtitle;
2. On one Sunday designated by the Department during the
deer firearms season;
3. In Kent County, on each Sunday during the deer bow
hunting season and the deer muzzle loader season;
– 3 –

Ch. 324 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
4. In Montgomery County, on one Sunday designated by the
Department during the deer bow hunting season; and
5. In Talbot County, on the last three Sundays in October
and the first two Sundays in November during the bow hunting season.
(4) The Department may allow a person to hunt deer during the deer
firearms season:
(i) On each Sunday in Harford County; and
(ii) On the first Sunday in Anne Arundel County.
(5) The Department may allow a person to hunt deer during the deer bow
hunting season on:
(i) The last three Sundays in October and the first two Sundays in
November in Harford County; and
(ii) The first Sunday in November in Anne Arundel County.
(6) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ALLOW A PERSON TO HUNT DEER ON
EACH SUNDAY OF THE DEER BOW HUNTING SEASON IN BALTIMORE CITY.
(7) The Department may allow a person to hunt turkey on each Sunday of
the spring turkey hunting season in:
(i) Carroll County;
(ii) Kent County; and
(iii) Talbot County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.
[(7)] (8) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subtitle, the
Department may allow a person with a deer management permit to shoot deer on any
Sunday throughout the year in accordance with the terms of the permit.
[(8)] (9) The Department may allow a person using a State certified
raptor to hunt game birds or mammals on each Sunday during the open season for the
game birds or mammals.
[(9)] (10) The Department may allow an unarmed person participating in
an organized fox chase to chase foxes on Sunday.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 324
[(10)] (11) The Department may allow a person shooting pen–reared game
birds or tower–released flighted mallard ducks to hunt on Sunday at a regulated shooting
ground in accordance with § 10–906 of this title.
[(11)] (12) The Department may allow a person who is 16 years old or
younger to hunt on Sunday if participating in a junior hunt established by the Department
in accordance with this subtitle.
[(12)] (13) Except as provided in paragraphs [(8)] (9) through [(10)] (11) of
this subsection and subject to paragraph [(7)] (8) of this subsection, a person may not hunt
on Sunday in:
(i) [Baltimore City;
(ii)] Baltimore County;
[(iii)] (II) Howard County; or
[(iv)] (III) Prince George’s County.
[(13)] (14) A person may not hunt migratory game birds on Sunday.
[(14)] (15) A person may not hunt on public land within the State park
system on Sunday.
[(15)] (16) (i) The Department may not allow a person to hunt on public
land designated for hunting by the Department on Sunday except in:
1. Allegany County;
2. Cecil County;
3. Garrett County;
4. St. Mary’s County;
5. Washington County;
6. Dorchester County, for turkey during the spring turkey
hunting season;
7. Frederick County, for deer from the first Sunday in
October through the second Sunday in January of the following year, inclusive;
– 5 –

Ch. 324 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
8. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, Somerset
County, on public land leased to a hunt club from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30
a.m.;
9. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, Worcester
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.; and
10. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Wicomico
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.
(ii) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)8 and 9 of this
paragraph do not apply:
1. On each Sunday of the deer firearms season; and
2. On the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November of the deer bow hunting season.
(iii) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)10 of this paragraph
do not apply:
1. On the first Sunday of the deer firearms season; and
2. On the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November of the deer bow hunting season.
(g) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, a
person, other than the owner or occupant, while hunting for any wild bird or mammal may
not shoot or discharge any firearm or other deadly weapon within 150 yards, known as the
“safety zone”, of a dwelling house, residence, church, or other building or camp occupied by
human beings, or shoot at any wild bird or mammal while it is within this area, without
the specific advance permission of the owner or occupant.
(3) (i) For archery hunters in Allegany County, BALTIMORE CITY,
Calvert County, Carroll County, Cecil County, Frederick County, Garrett County, Harford
County, Montgomery County, St. Mary’s County, Washington County, Worcester County,
or Wicomico County, the safety zone described in paragraph (1) of this subsection extends
for 50 yards from a dwelling house, residence, church, or any other building or camp
occupied by human beings.
10–906.
(b) (3) (i) As part of the application for a regulated shooting ground permit,
a person may apply to the Department for authorization to allow hunting on Sunday as
provided under [§ 10–410(a)(10)] § 10–410(A)(11) of this title.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 324
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 7 –